Vermont statutes. Title 5 Aeronautics and Surface Transportation Generally
Chapter 5. Assessments to Support Agency of Transportation and Transportation Board

§ 63.
Repealed.
1987, No. 160 (Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 26, 1988.

§ 64.
Assessment.

When the Agency of Transportation discovers from the examination of the return or otherwise that the revenue of any company has not been assessed, it may at any time within four years after the time when the return was due assess the revenue and give notice to the company of the assessment and, within 30 days, the company shall have an opportunity to confer with the Agency as to the proposed assessment.
The limitation of four years to the assessment of a tax or additional tax shall not apply to the assessment of additional taxes upon fraudulent returns.
After the expiration of 30 days from notification, the Agency shall reassess the revenue of the company which it finds has not been assessed and shall give notice to the company of the amount of the tax and interest and penalties, if any, and that amount shall be due and payable within ten days from the date of the notice.
No additional tax amounting to less than $1.00 shall be assessed.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 65.
Penalty.

When an annual report for any year is not given to the Agency of Transportation and the tax due is not paid on or before the next April 15, there shall be added to the tax an additional amount equal to five percent or $10.00, whichever is greater, if the return is made and tax paid within 15 days after becoming due, and 25 percent of the tax or $50.00, whichever is greater, if the return is not made and tax paid within 15 days after becoming due.
When a company that has failed to file the return or has filed an incorrect or insufficient return and has been notified by the Agency of its delinquency, refuses or neglects within 20 days after notice to file a proper return, or files a fraudulent return, the Agency shall determine the tax due according to its best information and belief and shall increase the amount of the tax so determined by 50 percent or $20.00, whichever is greater.
No assessment shall be made under this section unless made within four years from the date on which a correct return should have been filed, but the limitation of four years to the assessment of the tax or additional tax shall not apply to the assessment of additional taxes upon fraudulent returns.
The Agency may waive the penalties mentioned in this section if it is satisfied that the default was for any justifiable cause, and it may extend the time for filing returns or paying the tax, not to exceed four months.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 66.
Review.

The assessment by the Board or Agency of Transportation of any tax or penalty under the provisions of sections 64 and 65 of this title may be reviewed by the Washington Superior Court on petition filed by the company against the Board or Agency. The petition shall be brought within 90 days after the receipt by the company or its agent of written notice by the Board or Agency of its assessment.
The petition shall be verified by oath and a citation shall be annexed, signed by a judge or the clerk of the court.
If the assessment was made by the Board, the petition and citation shall be served on the Chair or Executive Secretary of the Board.
If the assessment was made by the Agency, the petition and citation shall be served on the Secretary of Transportation.
In each case, service shall be completed at least 12 days before it is returnable. Appropriate proceedings shall be had and the relief, if any, to which the company may be found entitled may be granted, and any taxes, interest, or penalties paid found by the court to be illegally assessed shall be ordered refunded to the company with interest at six percent per year from the time of payment, with costs, and judgment entered accordingly.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 67.
Determining correctness of returns; estimating taxes.

For the purpose of determining the correctness of any return or for the purpose of making an estimate of the taxes due from any company, the Agency of Transportation shall have power to examine or cause to be examined by any agent or representative designated by it for that purpose any books, papers, records, or memoranda of the company or of any person or corporation in the State bearing upon the matters required to be included in the return, and may require the attendance of any person having knowledge in the premises at any place in the county where the person resides, and may take testimony and require proof material for their information, with power to administer an oath to the person.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.